Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6110.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "universal constitutional remedies act". Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Color of law" means under color of a law, including under color of a statute, ordinance, regulation, custom, or usage, of the United States. (b) "Person" means an individual or a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, governmental entity, or other legal entity. Sec. 3. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), a person that, under color of law, subjects, or causes to be subjected, a citizen of the United States or another person within the jurisdiction of the United States to the deprivation of rights, privileges, or immunities secured by the Constitution of the United States is liable to the other person in a civil action or other proper proceeding for redress. (2) In an action brought under this act against a judicial officer for an act or omission made in the officer's judicial capacity, the court shall not grant injunctive relief unless a declaratory judgment was violated or declaratory relief was unavailable. Sec. 4. (1) A defendant in an action under this act may assert a defense of absolute or qualified immunity to the same extent as a person sued under 42 USC 1983 under like circumstances. (2) This act must not be construed to waive or abrogate a defense of sovereign immunity that is otherwise available to a party. Sec. 5. (1) In an action or proceeding under this act, the court, in its discretion, may award a prevailing plaintiff reasonable attorney fees as part of the costs, except that in an action brought against a judicial officer for an act or omission made in the officer's judicial capacity, the officer may not be held liable for any costs, including attorney fees, unless the conduct was clearly in excess of the officer's jurisdiction. (2) In awarding attorney fees under subsection (1), the court, in its discretion, may include expert fees as part of the attorney fees. Sec. 6. A civil action under this act may not be commenced later than 2 years after the cause of action accrues. Sec. 7. This act applies to a civil action or proceeding pending on or filed on or after the effective date of this act.